Nevada, session 83, AB474.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 422A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. To the extent that money is available for such
purposes, the Division shall establish and carry out a program to
supplement the supply of food available to recipients of benefits
provided under the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
using mechanisms designed to identify surplus food and distribute
such surplus food to the recipients at a discount.
2. In carrying out the program established pursuant to
subsection 1, the Division shall adopt a plan for the program that
must include, without limitation, a system to:
(a) Reduce food waste using technology to redirect surplus
food to areas in which recipients are experiencing a higher need
for more affordable and healthier food;
(b) Reduce food insecurity for recipients; and
(c) Increase access to food for recipients who are senior
citizens.
3. The Division shall take any action necessary to obtain
federal authorization to carry out the program established
pursuant to subsection 1, including, without limitation, applying
for any necessary federal waiver.
Sec. 3. 1. The Surplus Food Assistance Account is hereby
created in the State General Fund.
2. The Administrator shall administer the Account.
3. In addition to any direct legislative appropriation, the
Administrator may apply for and accept any gift, grant, bequest,
donation or other source of money. Any money so received must
be deposited in the Account.
-
*AB474_R1*

– 3 –
4. Any interest and income earned on money in the Account,
after deducting any applicable charges, must be credited to the
Account.
5. The money in the Account must be used only to carry out
the program established pursuant to section 2 of this act.
6. Claims against the Account must be paid as other claims
against the State are paid.
7. Any money remaining in the Account at the end of a fiscal
year does not revert to the State General Fund, and the balance in
the Account must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
Sec. 4. NRS 422A.232 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422A.232 1. [Any] Except as otherwise provided in section
3 of this act, any gifts or grants of money which the Division is
authorized to accept must be deposited in the State Treasury to the
credit of the Division of Welfare and Supportive Services’ Gift and
Cooperative Account in the Department of Health and Human
Services’ Gift Fund.
2. Money in the Account must be used for welfare purposes
only and expended in accordance with the terms of the gift or grant.
3. All claims must be approved by the Administrator before
they are paid.
Sec. 5. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Surplus Food Assistance Account created by section 3
of this act the sum of $5,000,000 to carry out the program
established pursuant to section 2 of this act.
Sec. 6. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*AB474_R1*